Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-705
Visitation; Department of Health and Human Services; power.

The Department of Health and Human Services, or such person as it may authorize, may visit any child so placed, who has not been legally adopted, with a view of ascertaining whether such child is being properly cared for and living under moral surroundings.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XI, § 5, p. 790;

C.S.1922, § 8269;

C.S.1929, § 71-2605;

R.S.1943, § 71-805;

Laws 1945, c. 170, § 5, p. 546;

Laws 1961, c. 204, § 9, p. 615;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 177;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 72.